Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2734.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; MINNESOTA GREEN IRON INITIATIVE.new text end new text begin $9,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $9,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for the Natural Resources Research Institute's Minnesota Green Iron Initiative to advance industrial decarbonization using hydrogen, renewable energy resources, infrastructure, and strong community engagement. new text end